Florida, session 2026, SB478.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 49 50 Section 1.âPart XVII of chapter 468, Florida Statutes, 51 consisting of ss. 468.8501-468.8507, Florida Statutes, is 52 created and entitled âMusic Therapy.â 53 Section 2.âSection 468.8501, Florida Statutes, is created 54 to read: 55 468.8501âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 56 (1)ââAdvisory committeeâ means the Music Therapy Advisory 57 Committee. 58 (2)ââBoard-certified music therapistâ means an individual 59 who holds current board certification from the Certification 60 Board for Music Therapists. 61 (3)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Health. 62 (4)ââLicensed professional music therapistâ means a person 63 licensed under this part to practice music therapy. 64 (5)ââPractice of music therapyâ means clinical and 65 evidence-based music interventions used by a board-certified 66 music therapist within a therapeutic relationship to accomplish 67 individualized goals for people of all ages and ability levels. 68 The term includes all of the following: 69 (a)âAccepting referrals for music therapy services from 70 medical, developmental, mental health, or education 71 professionals; family members; clients; caregivers; or other 72 professionals authorized to provide client services. 73 (b)âConducting music therapy assessments of clients to 74 determine whether treatment is indicated. If treatment is 75 indicated, the term includes the collection of systematic, 76 comprehensive, and accurate information to determine the 77 appropriateness and type of music therapy services to provide 78 for the client. 79 (c)âDevelopment of music therapy treatment plans 80 individualized to the needs and strengths of the specific 81 client, who may be seen individually or in groups, based upon 82 the results of the music therapy assessment as well as the 83 goals, objectives, and potential strategies for music therapy 84 services to achieve such goals in a manner appropriate for the 85 client and setting. 86 (d)âUse of interventions such as music improvisation, 87 receptive music listening, song writing, lyric discussion, music 88 and imagery, singing, music performance, learning through music, 89 music combined with other arts, music-assisted relaxation, 90 music-based patient education, electronic music technology, 91 adapted music intervention, and movement to music. 92 (e)âImplementing an individualized music therapy treatment 93 plan consistent with any other developmental, rehabilitative, 94 habilitative, medical, mental health, preventive, wellness care, 95 or educational services being provided to the client. 96 (f)âEvaluating the clientâs response to music therapy and 97 the music therapy treatment plan, documenting changes and 98 progress, and suggesting modifications, as appropriate. 99 (g)âDeveloping a plan, in collaboration with the client, a 100 physician or other provider of health care or education to the 101 client, family members of the client, and any other appropriate 102 person upon whom the client relies for support, for determining 103 when the provision of music therapy services is no longer 104 needed. 105 (h)âMinimizing any barriers to ensure that the client 106 receives music therapy services in the least restrictive 107 environment. 108 (i)âCollaborating with and educating the client and the 109 family, caregiver of the client, or any other appropriate person 110 regarding the needs of the client which are being addressed in 111 music therapy and the manner in which the music therapy 112 treatment addresses those needs. 113 (j)âUsing appropriate knowledge and skills to inform 114 practice, including use of research, reasoning, and problem 115 solving skills to determine appropriate actions in the context 116 of each specific clinical setting. 117 118 The term does not include the screening, diagnosis, or 119 assessment of any physical, mental, or communication disorder. 120 Section 3.âSection 468.8502, Florida Statutes, is created 121 to read: 122 468.8502âMusic Therapy Advisory Committee.â 123 (1)âThere is created within the department the Music 124 Therapy Advisory Committee to advise the department on its 125 duties under this part. 126 (2)âThe committee shall consist of five members appointed 127 by the State Surgeon General to serve staggered 4-year terms. 128 (a)âMembers must be familiar with the practice of music 129 therapy in order to serve on the committee. Three members must 130 be licensed professional music therapists under this part, one 131 member must be a licensed health care practitioner who is not a 132 licensed professional music therapist, and one member must be a 133 consumer. The initial appointments to the committee shall 134 consist of three music therapists who are not licensed under 135 this part but who have been engaged in their respective 136 practices for at least 3 years preceding the appointment. Once 137 licensing under this part is implemented, music therapists 138 appointed to the committee must hold the requisite license. 139 (b)âMembers may serve consecutive terms at the will of the 140 State Surgeon General. Any vacancy shall be filled in the same 141 manner as the original appointment. 142 (c)âMembers shall serve without compensation but are 143 entitled to reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses 144 pursuant to s. 112.061. 145 (3)âThe committee shall meet at least once per year and 146 upon the call of the State Surgeon General. 147 (4)âThe committee may facilitate the development of 148 materials that the department may use to educate the public 149 concerning professional music therapist licensure, the benefits 150 of music therapy, and the use of music therapy by individuals 151 and in facilities or institutional settings. 152 (5)âThe committee may act as a facilitator of statewide 153 dissemination of information between music therapists, the 154 American Music Therapy Association or any successor 155 organization, the Certification Board for Music Therapists or 156 any successor organization, and the department. 157 (6)âThe committee shall provide analysis of disciplinary 158 actions taken, appeals and denials, or revocation of licenses at 159 least once per year. 160 (7)âThe department shall seek the advice of the committee 161 for issues related to music therapy which come before the 162 department. 163 (8)âIn accordance with s. 20.052(8), this section is 164 repealed October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 165 through reenactment by the Legislature. 166 Section 4.âSection 468.8503, Florida Statutes, is created 167 to read: 168 468.8503âLicensure of music therapists.â 169 (1)âThe department shall issue a license to practice as a 170 professional music therapist to an applicant who meets all of 171 the following requirements: 172 (a)âHas submitted a completed application in a form and 173 manner prescribed by department rule. 174 (b)âIs at least 18 years of age. 175 (c)âHolds a minimum of a bachelorâs degree in a music 176 therapy program, or its equivalent, including clinical training 177 hours, from an accredited college or university. 178 (d)âIf applicable, is in good standing based on a review of 179 the applicantâs music therapy licensure history in other 180 jurisdictions, including a review of any alleged misconduct or 181 negligence in the practice of music therapy on the part of the 182 applicant. 183 (e)âProvides proof of passing the examination for board 184 certification offered by the Certification Board for Music 185 Therapists or its successor organization and provides proof that 186 the applicant is currently a board-certified music therapist or 187 in the process of being transitioned to board-certified status. 188 (2)âThe department shall issue a license by endorsement to 189 practice as a professional music therapist to an applicant who 190 has submitted a completed application in a form and manner as 191 prescribed by department rule and provides evidence satisfactory 192 to the department that he or she is licensed and in good 193 standing as a music therapist in another jurisdiction and that 194 the qualifications required for licensure in that jurisdiction 195 are equal to or greater than those required by this part at the 196 date of application. 197 (3)âProfessional music therapist licenses must be renewed 198 biennially. Each licensee is responsible for timely renewal of 199 his or her license. The department shall renew a professional 200 music therapist license upon submission of a renewal application 201 and proof of maintenance of the applicantâs status as a board 202 certified music therapist. The department may not renew a 203 license if the applicant is in violation of any provision of 204 this part at the time of application for renewal. 205 (4)âA licensee shall inform the department of any changes 206 to his or her address within 30 days after the change. 207 (5)âFailure to renew a license shall result in expiration 208 of the license. Expired licenses may be restored within 1 year 209 after the expiration date. Failure to restore an expired license 210 within 1 year after the date of its expiration results in the 211 automatic termination of the license, after which the individual 212 must reapply for a new license in order to practice under this 213 part. 214 (6)âUpon written request of a licensee, the department 215 shall place an active license on an inactive status. The 216 licensee, upon request, may continue on inactive status for a 217 period up to 2 years. An inactive license may be reactivated at 218 any time by making a written request to the department and by 219 fulfilling the applicable requirements for licensure under this 220 section. 221 Section 5.âSection 468.8504, Florida Statutes, is created 222 to read: 223 468.8504âPractice standards; collaboration.â 224 (1)âBefore a licensed professional music therapist provides 225 music therapy services to a client for an identified clinical or 226 developmental need, the licensee shall review the clientâs 227 diagnosis, treatment needs, and treatment plan with the health 228 care providers involved in the clientâs care. Before a licensed 229 professional music therapist provides music therapy services to 230 a student for an identified educational need in a special 231 education setting, the licensee shall review with the 232 individualized family service plan team or individualized 233 education program team the studentâs diagnosis, treatment needs, 234 and treatment plan. 235 (2)âDuring the provision of music therapy services to a 236 client, the licensed professional music therapist shall 237 collaborate, as applicable, with the clientâs treatment team, 238 including the clientâs physician, psychologist, licensed 239 clinical social worker, or other mental health professional, if 240 any. 241 (3)âDuring the provision of music therapy services to a 242 client with a communication disorder, the licensed professional 243 music therapist shall collaborate and discuss the music therapy 244 treatment plan with the clientâs audiologist or speech-language 245 pathologist so that the music therapist may work with the client 246 and address communication skills. When providing educational or 247 health care services, a licensed professional music therapist 248 may not replace the services provided by an audiologist or a 249 speech-language pathologist. Unless authorized to practice 250 speech-language pathology, music therapists may not evaluate, 251 examine, instruct, or counsel on speech, language, 252 communication, and swallowing disorders and conditions. An 253 individual licensed as a professional music therapist may not 254 represent to the public that the individual is authorized to 255 treat a communication disorder. This subsection does not 256 prohibit an individual licensed as a professional music 257 therapist from representing to the public that the individual 258 may work with clients who have a communication disorder and 259 address communication skills. 260 Section 6.âSection 468.8505, Florida Statutes, is created 261 to read: 262 468.8505âUnlicensed practice prohibited; exemptions.â 263 (1)âBeginning January 1, 2027, a person without a license 264 as a professional music therapist is prohibited from using the 265 title âmusic therapist,â âlicensed professional music 266 therapist,â or similar title to practice music therapy. This 267 section may not be construed to prohibit or restrict any of the 268 following: 269 (a)âA person licensed, certified, or regulated under the 270 laws of this state in another profession or occupation, 271 including, but not limited to, physicians, psychologists, 272 psychoanalysts, registered nurses, marriage and family 273 therapists, mental health counselors, social workers, 274 occupational therapists, speech-language pathologists or 275 audiologists, or personnel supervised by a licensed 276 professional, performing work, including the use of music, 277 incidental to the practice of his or her licensed, certified, or 278 regulated profession or occupation, if that person does not 279 represent himself or herself as a professional music therapist. 280 (b)âThe practice of a person whose training and national 281 certification attests to the individualâs preparation and 282 ability to practice his or her certified profession or 283 occupation, if that person does not represent himself or herself 284 as a professional music therapist. 285 (c)âAny practice of music therapy as an integral part of a 286 program of study for students enrolled in an accredited music 287 therapy program, if the student does not represent himself or 288 herself as a professional music therapist. 289 (2)âA person who is not a licensed professional music 290 therapist may provide music therapy under the supervision of a 291 licensed professional music therapist for a period not to exceed 292 180 days after the start of practice if: 293 (a)âThe personâs application to obtain board certification 294 is pending; and 295 (b)âThe person meets the remaining requirements for 296 licensure under this part. 297 Section 7.âSection 468.8506, Florida Statutes, is created 298 to read: 299 468.8506âDiscipline.â 300 (1)âThe following acts constitute grounds for denial of a 301 license or for disciplinary action, as applicable: 302 (a)âFailing to comply with the requirements for licensure, 303 including, but not limited to, failing to maintain board 304 certification as a music therapist; failing to provide updated 305 information to the department in a timely manner; or making 306 misleading, untrue, deceptive, or fraudulent representations on 307 an initial or renewal licensure application. 308 (b)âFailing to provide requested information to the 309 department in a timely manner. 310 (c)âBeing convicted of a felony. 311 (d)âBeing convicted of any crime that reflects an inability 312 to practice music therapy with due regard for the health and 313 safety of clients and patients or with due regard for the truth 314 in filing claims with Medicare, Medicaid, or any third-party 315 payor. 316 (e)âBeing unable or failing to practice music therapy with 317 reasonable skill and consistent with the welfare of clients, 318 including, but not limited to, by being negligent in the 319 practice of music therapy, being intoxicated, being 320 incapacitated, abusing a client, or engaging in sexual contact 321 with a client. 322 (f)âHaving disciplinary action taken against a license to 323 practice music therapy by another jurisdiction. 324 (g)âViolating any provision of this part. 325 (2)âThe department may conduct investigations into 326 allegations of misconduct described in subsection (1). 327 (3)âThe department may impose one or more of the following 328 sanctions for a violation of this part: 329 (a)âSuspension, revocation, or denial of a license. 330 (b)âRefusal to renew a license. 331 (c)âProbation with conditions. 332 (d)âA reprimand. 333 (e)âA fine of not less than $100 and not more than $1,000 334 for each violation. 335 Section 8.âSection 468.8507, Florida Statutes, is created 336 to read: 337 468.8507âRules.âBy October 1, 2026, the department shall 338 adopt rules to implement this part. 339 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.